Tennessee, session 114, HB1144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-24-109, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection (b):
(b) The reports required by subsection (a) must be posted on the department of
correction website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1144
003304
- 1 -